New York, session 2025-2026, S6713.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 506 of the laws of 2016, amending the 2 tax law relating to the imposition of an occupancy tax in the town of 3 North Castle, as amended by chapter 416 of the laws of 2022, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed September 1, [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10884-01-5